Maryland, session 2025, SB0730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
[13–1104.
(a) There is a Charles County Gaming Permit Review Board.
(b) (1) The board consists of seven members.
(2) Of the seven members of the board:
(i) one shall be a member of the county sheriff’s office;
(ii) one shall be a member of the Department of State Police;
(iii) one shall be a member of a fundraising organization in the
county;
(iv) one shall be an individual with background and experience in
finance; and
(v) three shall be members at large.
(3) Each member at large:
(i) shall be a member of the general public;
(ii) may not be a member of a fundraising organization or otherwise
be subject to regulation by the board;
(iii) may not, within 1 year before appointment, have had a financial
interest in or have received compensation from a person regulated by the board; and
(iv) may not, while a member of the board, have a financial interest
in or receive compensation from a person regulated by the board.
(4) Each member of the board shall be a resident of the county.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(5) The board shall select a chairperson from among its members, to serve
the term that the board sets.
(c) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.
(2) The terms of members are staggered as required by the terms provided
for members of the board on October 1, 2002.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(d) The board may recommend to the county commissioners:
(1) the types of gaming devices that may be operated in the county;
(2) approval or denial of a gaming permit; and
(3) modifications of the county gaming regulations and procedures.
(e) The board shall:
(1) review at least quarterly gaming permit applications;
(2) review gaming regulations and permit procedures;
(3) keep a list of all approved lessors of gaming devices and premises for
gaming events;
(4) keep a record of the gaming permits that the board has reviewed; and
(5) undertake the other duties regarding gaming regulation that the
county commissioners delegate.
(f) As the county commissioners consider appropriate, the county commissioners
shall provide for the board a clerk, legal counsel, supplies, and funding.
(g) The county commissioners may pay salaries to the members of the board.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 13–1105 through
13–1115 of Article – Criminal Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to
be Section(s) 13–1104 through 13–1114, respectively.
– 3 –

Ch. 82 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
13–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(b) “Board” means the Charles County Gaming Permit Review Board.]
(B) “COUNTY ATTORNEY” MEANS THE COUNTY ATTORNEY FOR CHARLES
COUNTY.
(c) “County commissioners” means the Board of County Commissioners of
Charles County.
13–1103.
The county commissioners may:
(1) designate the types of gaming devices that may be operated in the
county;
(2) set fees for gaming permits issued under this subtitle;
(3) [set salaries and funding for the board and the board’s clerk, legal
counsel, and support staff;
(4)] approve or deny gaming permit applications;
[(5)] (4) investigate persons involved in gaming events and examine
records of fundraising organizations with respect to gaming events;
[(6)] (5) delegate its powers and duties under this subtitle to the [board]
COUNTY ATTORNEY; and
[(7)] (6) adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
13–1105.
(c) (1) At least 30 days before the first day of the calendar quarter in which
the gaming event is to be conducted, a fundraising organization seeking a gaming permit
shall submit to the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY an application and the application fee.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 82
(2) The application shall contain the following:
(vii) any other information that the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY
considers necessary or helpful.
(e) (1) The [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY shall:
(i) review the gaming permit applications for a calendar quarter
within 10 days after the application deadline set in subsection (c)(1) of this section;
(ii) recommend approval or denial of each application; and
(iii) promptly forward the applications and recommendations to the
county commissioners.
(3) This section does not prevent the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY or the
county commissioners from reviewing gaming permit applications more frequently or
earlier than required by this subsection.
13–1107.
(a) (6) A fundraising organization may lease gaming devices or premises for a
gaming event only from a fundraising organization that the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY
approves.
(9) (iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a
fundraising organization that conducts a gaming event at the Charles County Fair in
conjunction with the Charles County Fair Board may conduct the gaming event under a
single gaming permit for more than 48 hours, subject to regulations that the county
commissioners adopt on recommendation of the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY.
(b) (1) A fundraising organization that has conducted a gaming event shall
submit a report to the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY within 30 days after the end of the
calendar quarter in which the gaming event was conducted.
(2) The report shall contain:
(iv) the date, amount, nature, source, and recipient of each receipt
and expenditure associated with the gaming event, in the format that the [board] COUNTY
ATTORNEY prescribes;
(ix) any other information that the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY
considers necessary or helpful.
(c) A fundraising organization that conducts a gaming event shall maintain
accurate records of each transaction concerning the gaming event, and shall keep the
– 5 –

Ch. 82 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
records available for examination by the [board] COUNTY ATTORNEY and the county
commissioners for 3 years after the gaming event.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 6 –